Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.040

Peddler's license—Cancellation of license.

Upon the expiration and return of a county license, the appropriate county official shall cancel it, indorse thereon the cancellation, and place it on file. After holding the special deposit of the licensee for a period of ninety days from the date of cancellation, he or she shall return the deposit or such portion as may remain in his or her hands after satisfying the claims made against it.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4122; 1985 c 91 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.040. Prior: 1909 c 214 s 5; RRS s 8357.]